Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 31 Rhode Island Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics Act

21-31-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Rhode Island Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Advertisement” means all representations disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or which are likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics.

“Contaminated with filth” applies to any food, drug, device, or cosmetic not securely protected from dust, dirt, and, as far as may be necessary by all reasonable means, from all foreign or injurious contaminations.

“Cosmetics” means: (i) articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or applied to the human body or any part of the body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance, and (ii) articles intended for use as a component of any articles described in this subdivision, except that this term shall not include soap.

“Device” (except when used in subdivision (23) of this section and in §§

21-31-3(10)

,

21-31-11(6)

,

21-31-15(a)(3)

, and

21-31-18(3)

) means instruments, apparatus, and contrivances, including their components, parts, and accessories, intended: (i) for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals; or (ii) to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or other animals.

“Director” means the director of health.

“Distressed merchandise” means any food which has had the label lost or which has been subjected to possible damage due to accident, fire, flood, adverse weather, or to any other similar cause, and which may have been rendered unsafe or unsuitable for human or animal consumption or use.

“Dosage form” means the form of the completed drug product (such as tablet, syrup, or suppository).

“Drug” means: (i) articles recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them; (ii) articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals; (iii) articles (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or other animals; and (iv) articles intended for use as a component of any article specified in paragraphs (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subdivision; but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

“Drug product” means a dosage form containing one or more active therapeutic ingredients along with other substances included during the manufacturing process.

“Equivalent and interchangeable” means having the same generic name, dosage form, and labeled potency, meeting standards of the United States Pharmacopoeia or National Formulary, or their successors, if applicable, and not found in violation of the requirements of the United States Food and Drug Administration, or its successor agency, or the department of health.

“Generic” means the chemical or established name of a drug or drug product.

“Federal Act” means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

“Food” means: (i) articles used for food or drink for humans or other animals, (ii) chewing gum, and (iii) articles used for components of any article described in this subdivision.

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container of any article; and a requirement made by or under authority of this chapter that any word, statement, or other information appearing on the label shall not be considered to be complied with unless the word, statement, or other information also appears on the outside container or wrapper, if any, of the retail package of the article, or is easily legible through the outside container or wrapper.

“Immediate container” does not include package liners.

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter: (A) upon an article or any of its containers or wrappers, or (B) accompanying the article.

If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading, or if an advertisement is alleged to be false because it is misleading, then in determining whether the labeling or advertisement is misleading there shall be taken into account (among other things) not only representations made or suggested by statement, word, design, device, sound, or in any combination of them, but also the extent to which the labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts material in the light of the representations or material with respect to consequences which may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement or under the conditions of use that are customary or usual.

“Native” means a product harvested in Rhode Island and is limited to the following:

“Bay scallop” means Argopecten irradians.

“Bay quahog” means Mercenaria mercenaria.

“Steamer clams” means Mya arenaria.

“Mussels” means Mytilus edulis.

“Oysters” means Crassostrea virginica.

“New drug” means: (i) any drug the composition of which is such that the drug is not generally recognized among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the safety of drugs as safe for use under conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling of it; or (ii) any drug the composition of which is such that the drug, as a result of investigations to determine its safety for use under those conditions has become so recognized, but which has not, otherwise than in the investigations, been used to a material extent or for a material time under those conditions.

“Official compendium” means the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them.

“Patient” means, as the case may be: (i) the individual medically requiring a drug, for whom a drug is prescribed; or (ii) the owner or the agent of the owner of an animal medically requiring a drug, for which a drug is prescribed.

“Person” includes individual, partnership, corporation, and association.

“Pharmacist” means a person duly registered with the board of pharmacy as a compounder, dispenser, or supplier of drugs upon prescription, including registered assistant pharmacists as defined by law.

“Pharmacy” means a place where drugs, medicines, or poisons are sold at retail or where prescriptions of physicians, dentists, veterinarians, and other practitioners authorized to issue prescriptions for drugs, medicines, and poisons are compounded, dispensed, supplied or sold.

“Practitioner” means a person authorized by law to practice medicine, dentistry, osteopathy, chiropody, or veterinary medicine in this state.

“Prescription” means an order, issued in good faith in the course of professional practice only, by a practitioner to a pharmacist for a drug for a particular patient, which specifies the date of its issue, the name and address of the practitioner, the name and address of the patient (and, if the drug is prescribed for an animal, the species of the animal), the name and quantity of the drug prescribed, directions for the use of the drug, and the signature of the practitioner; provided, that a prescription received by word of mouth, telephone, or other means of communication shall be reduced promptly to writing by the pharmacist in the form prescribed in this subdivision, and the record so made shall constitute the original prescription to be filed and preserved by the pharmacist; and, provided, further, that any refill authorization received by word of mouth, telephone, or other means of communication shall be reduced promptly to writing by the pharmacist, with the date of it on the face or on the reverse side of the original prescription.

The representation of a drug, in its labeling or advertisement, as an antiseptic shall be considered to be a representation that it is a germicide, except in the case of a drug purporting to be, or represented as, an antiseptic for inhibitory use as a wet dressing, ointment, dusting powder, or any other use that involves prolonged contact with the body.

The provisions of this chapter regarding the selling of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics shall be considered to include the manufacture, production, processing, packing, exposure, offer, possession, and holding of any article for sale, and the sale, dispensing, and giving of any article, and the supplying or applying of the articles in the conduct of any food, drug, or cosmetic establishment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 187, § 1.

21-31-3.
Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the causing of those acts within the state of Rhode Island are prohibited:

The manufacture, sale, or delivery, or holding or offering for sale of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded.

The adulteration or misbranding of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic.

The receipt in commerce of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded, and the delivery or proferred delivery of it for pay or otherwise.

The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of any article in violation of §

21-31-12

or

21-31-16

.

The dissemination of any false advertisement.

The refusal to permit entry or inspection, or to permit the taking of a sample, as authorized by §

21-31-21

.

The giving of a guaranty of undertaking which guaranty or undertaking is false, except by a person who relied on a guaranty or undertaking to the same effect signed by, and containing the name and address of, the person residing in the state of Rhode Island from whom he or she received in good faith the food, drug, device, or cosmetic.

The removal or disposal of a detained or embargoed article in violation of §

21-31-6

.

The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or removal of the whole or any part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to, a food, drug, device, or cosmetic, if that act is done while the article is held for sale and results in the article’s being adulterated or misbranded.

Forging, counterfeiting, simulating, or falsely representing, or without proper authority using, any mark, stamp, tag, label, or other identification device authorized or required by regulations promulgated under the provisions of this chapter.

The using, on the labeling of any drug or in any advertisement relating to the drug, of any representation or suggestion that any application with respect to the drug is effective under §

21-31-16

, or that the drug complies with the provisions of that section.

The possession of any habit-forming, toxic, harmful, or new drug subject to §

21-31-15(a)

unless the possession of that drug has been obtained by a valid prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to administer those drugs; provided, that the provisions of this subdivision shall not be applicable to the delivery of those drugs to persons included in any of the classes named below, or to the agents or employees of these persons, for use in the usual course of their official duties, as the case may be, or to the possession of those drugs by these persons or their agents or employees for that use: (A) pharmacists; (B) practitioners; (C) persons who procure the drugs for disposition by or under the supervision of pharmacists or practitioners employed by them or for the purpose of lawful research, teaching, or testing, and not for resale; (D) hospitals or other institutions which procure the drugs for lawful administration by practitioners; (E) officers or employees of federal, state, or local governments; (F) manufacturers and wholesalers lawfully engaged in selling those drugs to authorized persons; and (G) common carriers and warehouse operators while engaged in lawfully transporting or storing the drugs for authorized persons.

The possession of a drug under paragraph (i) of this subdivision not properly labeled to indicate that possession is by a valid prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to administer the drug by any person not exempted under this chapter shall be prima facie evidence that the possession is unlawful; provided, that the provisions of this paragraph shall not be applicable where a portion of the whole amount of a drug lawfully obtained under the provisions of this chapter not in excess of an amount sufficient to meet the medical requirements of the patient in any twenty-four (24) consecutive hours, as indicated in the directions for use by the practitioner prescribing or dispensing the drug, is possessed in a container to suit the convenience of the patient.

The sale of all unprocessed and/or uncooked fish, shellfish, and scallops by retail markets and other retailers without a label indicating whether the fish, shellfish, or scallops have ever been frozen.

The making, issuing, or uttering of any false or forged prescription.

The processing or selling or holding for sale of any “distressed merchandise” in this state without a permit from the director of health.

The holding, selling, or offering for sale of any food (or drug) which has been condemned or voluntarily disposed of by action of the director of health.

Use of the term “native” unless used as defined in §

21-31-2

. The retail consumer has a right to know and the retailer shall provide upon request the origin of nonnative uncooked and/or unprocessed shellfish and/or scallops.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 267, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 64.

21-31-4.
Injunctions authorized.

In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter the director of health is authorized to apply to the superior court for, and the court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of §

21-31-3

, irrespective of whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-5.
Violations of chapter — Penalty — Exceptions.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of §

21-31-3

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than six (6) months or a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both imprisonment and fine; but if the violation is committed after a conviction of that person under this section has become final, the person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than one year or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both that imprisonment and fine.

No person shall be subject to the penalties of subsection (a) of this section for having violated §

21-31-3(1)

or (3) if that person establishes a guaranty or undertaking signed by, and containing the name and address of, the person residing in the state of Rhode Island from whom the person received the article in good faith, to the effect that the article is not adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of this chapter, designating this chapter.

No publisher, radio broadcast licensee, or agency or medium for the dissemination of an advertisement, except the manufacturer, packer, distributor, or seller of the article to which a false advertisement relates, shall be liable under this section by reason of the dissemination by that person of a false advertisement, unless he or she has refused the request of the director of health to furnish the director of health the name and post office address of the manufacturer, packer, distributor, seller, or advertising agency residing in the state of Rhode Island who caused the person to disseminate the false advertisement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-6.
Embargoed articles — Condemnation and destruction.

Whenever a duly authorized agent of the director of health finds or has probable cause to believe that any food, drug, device, or cosmetic is adulterated, or so misbranded as to be dangerous or fraudulent, within the meaning of this chapter, the agent shall affix to that article a tag or other appropriate marking, giving notice that the article is, or is suspected of being, adulterated or misbranded and has been detained or embargoed, and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of the article by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the agent or the court. It shall be unlawful for any person to remove or dispose of a detained or embargoed article by sale or otherwise without permission.

When an article detained or embargoed under subsection (a) of this section has been found by the agent to be adulterated or misbranded, the agent shall petition the proper judge of the court in whose jurisdiction the article is detained or embargoed for a label for condemnation of the article. When the agent has found that an article so detained or embargoed is not adulterated or misbranded, he or she shall remove the tag or other marking.

If the court finds that a detained or embargoed article is adulterated or misbranded, the article shall, after entry of the decree, be destroyed at the expense of the claimant of the article, under the supervision of the agent, and all court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses, shall be taxed against the claimant of the article or the claimant’s agent; provided, that when the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the article, the court, after entry of the decree and after costs, fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond, conditioned that the article shall be so labeled or processed, has been executed, may by order direct that the article be delivered to the claimant of it for labeling or processing under the supervision of an agent of the director of health. The expense of the supervision shall be paid by the claimant. The article shall be returned to the claimant of the article on representation to the court by the director of health that the article is no longer in violation of this chapter, and that the expenses of the supervision have been paid.

Whenever the director of health or any of the director’s authorized agents shall find in any room, building, vehicle of transportation, or other structure, any meat, sea food, poultry, vegetable, fruit, or other perishable articles which are unsound, or contain any filthy, decomposed, or putrid substance, or that may be poisonous or deleterious to health or otherwise unsafe, it being hereby declared to be a nuisance, the director of health or the director’s authorized agent shall immediately condemn or destroy it, or in any other manner render it unsalable as human food.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 6.

21-31-7.
Violations reported to attorney general — Notice and hearing on violation.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general, to whom the director of health reports any violation of this chapter, to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the proper courts without delay and to be prosecuted in the manner required by law. Before any violation of this chapter, except those violations which involve attempts to procure or procurement of drugs by unlawful means, or the unlawful manufacture, possession, sale, barter, gift, transfer, or delivery in any manner to another of a drug as defined in this chapter, is reported to the attorney general for the institution of a criminal proceeding, the person against whom the proceeding is contemplated shall be given appropriate notice and opportunity to present his or her views before the director of health or the director’s designated agent, either orally or in writing in person, or by attorney, with regard to the contemplated proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 267, § 1.

21-31-8.
Notice of minor violations — Warnings.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director of health to report for the institution of proceedings under this chapter minor violations of this chapter, whenever the director of health believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-9.
Promulgation of reasonable standards by director.

Whenever in the judgment of the director of health an action will promote honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, the director of health shall promulgate regulations fixing and establishing for any food or class of food a reasonable definition and standard of identity, and/or reasonable standard of quality and/or fill of container. In prescribing a definition and standard of identity for any food or class of food in which optional ingredients are permitted, the director of health shall, for the purpose of promoting honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, designate the optional ingredients which shall be named on the label. The definitions and standards promulgated shall conform so far as practicable to the definitions and standards promulgated under authority of the Federal Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-10.
Adulterated food.

A food shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If: (i) it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added substance the food shall not be considered adulterated under this clause if the quantity of that substance in the food does not ordinarily render it injurious to health; (ii) it bears or contains any added poisonous or added deleterious substance which is unsafe within the meaning of §

21-31-13

; (iii) it consists in whole or in part of a diseased, contaminated, filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance, or if it is unfit for food; (iv) it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions by which it may have become contaminated with filth, or by which it may have been rendered diseased, unwholesome, or injurious to health; (v) it is the product of a diseased animal or an animal which has died otherwise than by slaughter, or that has been fed upon the uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse; or (vi) its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health.

If: (i) any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted from it; (ii) any substance has been substituted wholly or in part for it; (iii) damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner; or (iv) any substance has been added to it or mixed or packed with it so as to increase its bulk or weight or reduce its quality or strength or make it appear better or of greater value than it is.

If it is confectionery and it bears or contains any alcohol or non-nutritive article or substance except harmless coloring, harmless flavoring, harmless resinous glaze not in excess of four-tenths of one percent (0.4%), harmless natural wax not in excess of four-tenths of one percent (0.4%), harmless natural gum, or pectin; provided, that this subdivision shall not apply to any confectionery by reason of its containing less than one-half of one percent (.5%) by volume of alcohol derived solely from the use of flavoring extracts, or to any chewing gum by reason of its containing harmless non-nutritive masticatory substances.

If it bears or contains a coal-tar color other than one from a batch which has been certified under authority of the Federal Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-11.
Misbranded food.

A food shall be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any way.

If it is offered for sale under the name of another food.

If it is an imitation of another food for which a definition and standard of identity have been prescribed by regulations as provided by §

21-31-9

; or if it is an imitation of another food that is not subject to subdivision (7) of this section, unless its label bears in type of uniform size and prominence, the word, “imitation,” and, immediately after it, the name of the food imitated.

If its container is made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.

If in package form, unless it bears a label containing: (i) the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; (ii) an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; provided, that under paragraph (ii) of this subdivision reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established, by regulations prescribed by the director of health.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed on it with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If it purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of identity have been prescribed by regulations as provided by §

21-31-9

, unless: (i) it conforms to the definition and standard, and (ii) its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard, and, insofar as may be required by the regulations, the common names of optional ingredients (other than spices, flavoring, and coloring) present in the food.

If it purports to be or is represented as:

A food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed by regulations as provided by §

21-31-9

and its quality falls below that standard unless its label bears, in the manner and form that the regulations specify, a statement that it falls below the standard; or

A food for which a standard or standards of fill of container have been prescribed by regulation as provided by §

21-31-9

and it falls below the standard of fill of container applicable to it, unless its label bears, in the manner and form that the regulations specify, a statement that it falls below the standard.

Fresh uncooked meat or meat food product for human consumption which consists wholly or in part of refrozen meat unless it is clearly labeled as refrozen.

If it is not subject to the provisions of subdivision (7) of this section, unless it bears labeling clearly giving: (i) the common or usual name of the food, if any, and (ii) in case it is fabricated from two (2) or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each ingredient; except that spices, flavorings, and colorings, other than those sold as such, may be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings, without naming each; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of paragraph (ii) of this subdivision is impractical or results in deception or unfair competition, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the director of health; provided, that the requirements of paragraph (ii) of this subdivision shall not apply to any carbonated beverage, the ingredients of which have been fully and correctly disclosed, to the extent prescribed by paragraph (ii) of this subdivision, to the director of health in an affidavit.

If it purports to be or is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears the information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties that the director of health determines to be, and by regulations prescribes, as necessary in order to fully inform purchasers as to its value for those uses.

If it bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical preservative, unless it bears labeling stating that fact; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subdivision is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated by the director of health.

If it is a product intended as an ingredient of another food and when used according to the directions of the purveyor will result in the final food product being adulterated or misbranded.

If its packaging or labeling is in violation of an applicable regulation issued pursuant to §

23-24.1-3

or

23-24.1-4

of the Poison Prevention Packaging Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 90, § 4; P.L. 1979, ch. 252, § 1.

21-31-12.
Contamination of food with microorganisms — Suspension of permit — Inspection.

Whenever the director of health finds after investigation that the distribution in Rhode Island of any class of food may, by reason of contamination with microorganisms during manufacture, processing, or packing of it in any locality, be injurious to health, and that the injurious nature cannot be adequately determined after the articles have entered commerce, it then, and only in that case, shall promulgate regulations providing for the issuance, to manufacturers, processors, or packers of that class of food in the locality, of permits to which shall be attached any conditions governing the manufacture, processing, or packing of that class of food, and for any temporary period of time that may be necessary to protect the public health; and after the effective date of the regulations and during the temporary period, no person shall introduce or deliver for introduction into commerce that food manufactured, processed, or packed by any manufacturer, processor, or packer unless the manufacturer, processor, or packer holds a permit issued by the director of health as provided by regulation.

The director of health is authorized to suspend immediately upon notice any permit issued under authority of this section if it is found that any of the conditions of the permit have been violated. The holder of a permit suspended shall be privileged at any time to apply for the reinstatement of the permit, and the director of health shall, immediately after a prompt hearing and inspection of the establishment, reinstate the permit if it is found that adequate measures have been taken to comply with and maintain the conditions of the permit, as originally issued, or as amended.

Any officer or employee duly designated by the director of health shall have access to any factory or establishment, the operator of which holds a permit from the director of health, for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not the conditions of the permit are being complied with, and denial of access for the inspection shall be ground for suspension of the permit until access is freely given by the operator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.

21-31-13.
Poisonous or deleterious substance — Regulations as to use.

Any poisonous or deleterious substance added to any food, except where the substance is required in the production of it or cannot be avoided by good manufacturing practice, shall be deemed to be unsafe for purposes of the application of § 21-31-10(1)(ii); but when a substance is required or cannot be avoided, the director of health shall promulgate regulations limiting the quantity in it or on it to the extent that the director of health finds necessary for the protection of public health, and any quantity exceeding the limits fixed shall also be deemed to be unsafe for purposes of the application of § 21-31-10(1)(ii). While a regulation is in effect limiting the quantity of any substance in the case of any food, that food shall not, by reason of bearing or containing any added amount of the substance, be considered to be adulterated within the meaning of § 31-21-10(1)(i). In determining the quality of the added substance to be tolerated in or on different articles of food, the director of health shall take into account the extent to which the use of the substance is required or cannot be avoided in the production of each article and the other ways in which the consumer may be affected by the same or other poisonous or deleterious substances.

To assist the director in carrying out his or her responsibilities under this section, the director is authorized to collect food samples and to provide laboratory analyses to further the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 73, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 280, § 1.

21-31-14.
Adulterated drug or device.

A drug or device shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If: (i) it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance; (ii) it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions by which it may have been contaminated with filth, or by which it may have been rendered injurious to health; (iii) it is a drug and its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health; or (iv) it is a drug and it bears or contains, for purposes of coloring only, a coal-tar color other than one from a batch certified under the authority of the Federal Act.

If it purports to be or is represented as a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, and its strength differs from, or its quality or purity falls below, the standard set forth in the compendium. A determination as to strength, quality, or purity shall be made in accordance with the tests or methods of assay set forth in the compendium, or in the absence of or inadequacy of the tests or methods of assay, those prescribed under authority of the Federal Act. No drug defined in an official compendium shall be deemed to be adulterated under this subdivision because it differs from the standard of strength, quality, or purity set forth in an official compendium, if its difference in strength, quality, or purity from the standard is plainly stated on its label. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States Pharmacopoeia and the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States it shall be subject to the requirements of the United States Pharmacopoeia unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it shall be subject to the provisions of the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States and not to those of the United States Pharmacopoeia.

If it is not subject to the provisions of subdivision (2) of this section and its strength differs from, or its purity or quality falls below, that which it purports or is represented to possess.

If it is a drug and any substance has been: (i) mixed or packed with it so as to reduce its quality or strength; or (ii) substituted wholly or in part for it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 56, § 1.